Utah statutes.
31A-26-305.   Request for accepted check.

If an insurance policy claimant entitled to receive money in settlement of a claim makes a timely request to the insurer for payment by accepted check, the insurer shall make payment to the claimant with a check accepted by the drawee under Sections 70A-3-410 through 70A-3-413.



Amended by Chapter 204, 1986 General Session

